Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1726
Classified service, defined.

For purposes of sections 23-1721 to 23-1736, classified service includes all deputy sheriffs including the jailer and matrons but does not include the civilian employees of the office. The deputy sheriff designated by the sheriff as chief deputy is specifically excluded from sections 23-1721 to 23-1736.

Laws 1969, c. 140, § 6, p. 643;

Laws 2003, LB 222, § 5.